vec_IT/vec_IT.aff
FLAG long
# vèrbi -àr, -ér, -<is>ír, -ír, -<is>ír/-ír
# themeT1 + r/a0a1a2P0P1P2, themeT1 + r/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2, themeT1 + r/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2, themeT1 + r/a0a1a2f0f1f2P0P1P2
# themeT8 + o/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0
# themeT8 + oe/a0a1a2I1
SFX a0 Y 410
SFX a0 0 ane/I1 [aei]r	ts:indicative_future is:interrogative
SFX a0 0 atu/I3 [aei]r	ts:indicative_future is:interrogative
SFX a0 0 ave/P3 [aei]r	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 0 e [aei]r	ts:infinitive_simple
SFX a0 0 emo/P0I0 [aei]r	ts:indicative_future
SFX a0 0 en/I0 [aei]r	ts:indicative_future
SFX a0 0 ene/I1 [aei]r	ts:indicative_future is:interrogative
SFX a0 0 ense [aei]r	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 0 ensi [aei]r	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 0 esene/I1 [aei]r	ts:conditional_present is:interrogative
SFX a0 0 esi/I4 [aei]r	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 0 esiu/I5 [aei]r	ts:conditional_present is:interrogative
SFX a0 0 imo/P0I0 er	ts:indicative_future
SFX a0 0 ion/P0I0 [^cijɉñ][aei]r	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 0 ione/I1 [^cijɉñ][aei]r	ts:conditional_present is:interrogative
SFX a0 0 ionme/P6 [^cijɉñ][aei]r
SFX a0 0 isen/I0 [aei]r	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 0 isene/I1 [aei]r	ts:conditional_present is:interrogative
SFX a0 0 isense [aei]r	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 0 isensi [aei]r	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 0 ision/I0 [aei]r	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 0 isione/I1 [aei]r	ts:conditional_present is:interrogative
SFX a0 0 isionse [aei]r	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 0 isié/I4 [aei]r	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 0 isiéu/I5 [aei]r	ts:conditional_present is:interrogative
SFX a0 0 ison/I0 [aei]r	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 0 isone/I1 [aei]r	ts:conditional_present is:interrogative
SFX a0 0 isonse [aei]r	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 0 ié/I4 [aei]r	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 0 iéu/I5 [aei]r	ts:conditional_present is:interrogative
SFX a0 0 iónmene/P6 [^cijɉñ][aei]r
SFX a0 0 me/P6 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 on/P0I0 [aei]r	ts:indicative_future
SFX a0 0 onme/P6 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 à/P3I0I2 [aei]r	ts:indicative_future
SFX a0 0 àe/P3 [aei]r	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 0 è/I0 [aei]r	ts:indicative_future
SFX a0 0 ène/I1 [aei]r	ts:indicative_future is:interrogative
SFX a0 0 é/I4 [aei]r	ts:indicative_future
SFX a0 0 émoe/I1 [aei]r	ts:indicative_future is:interrogative
SFX a0 0 ésimo/I0 [aei]r	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 0 ésimoe/I1 [aei]r	ts:conditional_present is:interrogative
SFX a0 0 ésitu/I3 [aei]r	ts:conditional_present is:interrogative
SFX a0 0 éu/I5 [aei]r	ts:indicative_future is:interrogative
SFX a0 0 í/I4 er	ts:indicative_future
SFX a0 0 ía/I0I2 [aei]r	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 0 èe/P3I0I2 [aei]r	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 0 íane/I1 [aei]r	ts:conditional_present is:interrogative
SFX a0 0 íatu/I3 [aei]r	ts:conditional_present is:interrogative
SFX a0 0 íe/P3I0 [aei]r	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 0 íene/I1 [aei]r	ts:conditional_present is:interrogative
SFX a0 0 ímoe/I1 er	ts:indicative_future is:interrogative
SFX a0 0 íu/I5 er	ts:indicative_future is:interrogative
SFX a0 0 ò/I0 [aei]r	ts:indicative_future
SFX a0 0 òe/I1 [aei]r	ts:indicative_future is:interrogative
SFX a0 0 ónmene/P6 [aei]r
SFX a0 ar ede/I4 ar	ts:subjunctive_present
SFX a0 ar ege/I4 ar	ts:subjunctive_present
SFX a0 ar emo/P0I0 ar	ts:indicative_present ts:subjunctive_present
SFX a0 ar en/I0 ar	ts:indicative_present ts:subjunctive_present
SFX a0 ar endo/P0 ar	ts:gerund_simple
SFX a0 ar ene/I1 ar	ts:indicative_present ts:subjunctive_present is:interrogative
SFX a0 ar ense ar	ts:indicative_imperfect ts:subjunctive_imperfect
SFX a0 ar ensi ar	ts:indicative_imperfect ts:subjunctive_imperfect
SFX a0 ar ente/M0Ᵽd ar	ts:participle_active
SFX a0 ar ènte/M0 ar	ts:participle_active
SFX a0 ar erane/I1 ar	ts:indicative_future is:interrogative
SFX a0 ar eratu/I3 ar	ts:indicative_future is:interrogative
SFX a0 ar erave/P3 ar	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 ar eremo/P0I0 ar	ts:indicative_future
SFX a0 ar eren/I0 ar	ts:indicative_future
SFX a0 ar erene/I1 ar	ts:indicative_future is:interrogative
SFX a0 ar erense ar	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 ar erensi ar	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 ar eresi/I4 ar	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 ar eresiu/I5 ar	ts:conditional_present is:interrogative
SFX a0 ar erion/I0 ar	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 ar erione/I1 ar	ts:conditional_present is:interrogative
SFX a0 ar erionse ar	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 ar erisen/I0 ar	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 ar erisene/I1 ar	ts:conditional_present is:interrogative
SFX a0 ar erisense ar	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 ar erisensi ar	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 ar erisi/I4 ar	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 ar erision/I0 ar	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 ar erisione/I1 ar	ts:conditional_present is:interrogative
SFX a0 ar erisionse ar	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 ar erisiu/I5 ar	ts:conditional_present is:interrogative
SFX a0 ar erisié/I4 ar	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 ar erisiéu/I5 ar	ts:conditional_present is:interrogative
SFX a0 ar erison/I0 ar	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 ar erisone/I1 ar	ts:conditional_present is:interrogative
SFX a0 ar erisonse ar	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 ar erié/I4 ar	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 ar eriéu/I5 ar	ts:conditional_present is:interrogative
SFX a0 ar eron/I0 ar	ts:indicative_future
SFX a0 ar erone/I1 ar	ts:indicative_future is:interrogative
SFX a0 ar eronse ar	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 ar erà/P3I0I2 ar	ts:indicative_future
SFX a0 ar eràe/P3 ar	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 ar eràvene/I1 ar	ts:conditional_present is:interrogative
SFX a0 ar erè/I0 ar	ts:indicative_future
SFX a0 ar erène/I1 ar	ts:indicative_future is:interrogative
SFX a0 ar eré/I4 ar	ts:indicative_future
SFX a0 ar erémoe/I1 ar	ts:indicative_future is:interrogative
SFX a0 ar erémome/P6 ar
SFX a0 ar erémomene/P6 ar
SFX a0 ar erésimo/I0 ar	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 ar erésimoe/I1 ar	ts:conditional_present is:interrogative
SFX a0 ar erésitu/I3 ar	ts:conditional_present is:interrogative
SFX a0 ar eréu/I5 ar	ts:indicative_future is:interrogative
SFX a0 ar ería/I0I2 ar	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 ar erèe/P3I0I2 ar	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 ar eríane/I1 ar	ts:conditional_present is:interrogative
SFX a0 ar eríatu/I3 ar	ts:conditional_present is:interrogative
SFX a0 ar eríe/P3I0I2 ar	ts:conditional_present
SFX a0 ar eríene/I1 ar	ts:conditional_present is:interrogative
SFX a0 ar erísitu/I3 ar	ts:conditional_present is:interrogative
SFX a0 ar erò/I0 ar	ts:indicative_future
SFX a0 ar eròe/I1 ar	ts:indicative_future is:interrogative
SFX a0 ar ese/M0 ar	ts:subjunctive_imperfect
SFX a0 ar esto/A1 ar	ts:participle_passive
SFX a0 ar eva/P3I0I4 ar	ts:indicative_imperfect
SFX a0 ar eve/I0 ar	ts:indicative_imperfect
SFX a0 ar evi/I0I2I4 ar	ts:indicative_imperfect
SFX a0 ar evo/I0 ar	ts:indicative_imperfect
SFX a0 ar èva/P3I0I4 ar	ts:indicative_imperfect
SFX a0 ar ève/I0 ar	ts:indicative_imperfect
SFX a0 ar èvi/I0I2I4 ar	ts:indicative_imperfect
SFX a0 ar èvo/I0 ar	ts:indicative_imperfect
SFX a0 ar iede/I4 [^cijɉñ]ar	ts:subjunctive_imperfect
SFX a0 ar iege/I4 [^cijɉñ]ar	ts:subjunctive_imperfect
SFX a0 ar ion/P0I0 [^cijɉñ]ar	ts:indicative_imperfect ts:subjunctive_present ts:subjunctive_imperfect
SFX a0 ar ione/I1 [^cijɉñ]ar	ts:indicative_imperfect ts:subjunctive_present ts:subjunctive_imperfect is:interrogative
SFX a0 ar ionme/P6 [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX a0 ar isen/I0 ar	ts:subjunctive_imperfect
SFX a0 ar isene/I1 ar	ts:subjunctive_imperfect is:interrogative
SFX a0 ar isense ar	ts:subjunctive_imperfect
SFX a0 ar isensi ar	ts:subjunctive_imperfect
SFX a0 ar isiede/I4 ar	ts:subjunctive_imperfect
SFX a0 ar isiege/I4 ar	ts:subjunctive_imperfect
SFX a0 ar ision/I0 ar	ts:subjunctive_imperfect
SFX a0 ar isione/I1 ar	ts:subjunctive_imperfect is:interrogative
SFX a0 ar isionse ar	ts:subjunctive_imperfect
SFX a0 ar isié/I4 ar	ts:subjunctive_imperfect
SFX a0 ar ison/I0 ar	ts:subjunctive_imperfect
SFX a0 ar isone/I1 ar	ts:subjunctive_imperfect is:interrogative
SFX a0 ar isonse ar	ts:subjunctive_imperfect
SFX a0 ar iven/I0 ar	ts:indicative_imperfect
SFX a0 ar ivene/I1 ar	ts:indicative_imperfect is:interrogative
