vec_IT/vec_IT.dic
andonar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
atívoe/a0a1a2I1-1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:ativar
balbetar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
barbajar/a0a1a2P0P1P2+0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
bàxoe/a0a1a2I1:0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:baxar
biankíxoe/a0a1a2I1*0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:biankixar
bójoe/a0a1a2I1*0.0^6	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:bójer
inboskàjoe/a0a1a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:inboskajar
breveto/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:brevetar
búxero/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0+0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:buxerar
incepar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
dexinar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
drésoe/a0a1a2I1+0.0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:dresar
đermoɉar/a0a1P0P1	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
èdukoe/a0a1a2I1+0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:edukar
fagòto/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0+0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:fagotar
edífego/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:edifegar
fetonar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
desfistolar/a0a1P0P1	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
forteŧar/a0a1P0P1	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
frexio/a0a1a2P0P1P2I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:frexiar
fúxoƚo/a0a2P0P2I0+0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:fuxoƚar
garbúɉoe/a0a1a2I1+0-1*0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:garbuɉar
xgomento/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:xgomentar
rengrasio/a0a1a2P0P1P2I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:rengrasiar
xgròsoe/a0a1a2I1-0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:xgrosar
indavalkar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
inɉóoe/a0a1a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:inɉoar
inkaenasar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
kanaƚíxoe/a0a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:kanaƚixar
kaređo/a0a1P0P1FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:kaređar
inkàtigoe/a0a1a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:inkatigar
konpútoe/a0a1a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:konputar
korteƚar/a0a2P0P2*0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
krónpoe/a0a1a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:kronpar
ƚaoro/a0a2P0P2I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:ƚaorar
delíneo/a0a1P0P1I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:delinear
malinkonikir/a0a1d0d1P0P1	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
intramexo/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:intramexar
mòrbo/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0+0*0@0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:morbar
norigo/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:norigar
osar/a0a1a2P0P1P2+0-1r5	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
parixo/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:parixar
pentir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2+0r0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
pilastro/a0a1P0P1I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:pilastrar
inpontilio/a0a1P0P1I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:inpontiliar
putaníđoe/a0a1I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:putaniđar
darívoe/a0a1a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:darivar
salúoe/a0a1I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:saluar
sfàrŧoe/a0a1I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:sfarŧar
skoređo/a0a1P0P1FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:skoređar
spasar/a0a1a2P0P1P2-0r5V0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
estírpoe/a0a1a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:estirpar
takexar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
tèro/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0+0@0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:terar
tràpoloe/a0a1I1+0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:trapolar
susédoe/a0a1a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:suséder
presípitoe/a0a1a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:presipitar
prevàrikoe/a0a1a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:prevarikar
stravínoe/a0a1a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:stravinar
xmariliar/a0a1P0P1	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
